Idaho, session 2025, H0416.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 10, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-1035, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-1035. BINDING ALLOCATIONS. Any funds distributed by the state de-
partment of education to school districts or public charter schools that are
specifically identified in statute or in an appropriation bill as intended
for a certain purpose shall be used only for such purpose. Any funds intended
for a certain purpose but used for another purpose shall be reimbursed to the
state by the school district or public charter school and deposited to the
state general fund. If the school district or public charter school fails to
make such reimbursement, an amount equivalent to the misused funds shall be
deducted from the state's next payment to the school district or public char-
ter school pursuant to this chapter or chapter 52, title 33, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.